Utah statutes.
70A-3-106.   Unconditional promise or order.
(1)  Except as provided in this section, for the purposes of Subsection
70A-3-104 (1), a promise or order is unconditional unless it states an express
condition to payment, that the promise or order is subject to or governed by
another writing, or that rights or obligations with respect to the promise or
order are stated in another writing.  A reference to another writing does not
of itself make the promise or order conditional.
(2)  A promise or order is not made conditional by a reference to another
writing for a statement of rights with respect to collateral, prepayment, or
acceleration, or because payment is limited to resort to a particular fund or
source.
(3)  If a promise or order requires, as a condition to payment, a
countersignature by a person whose specimen signature appears on the promise
or order, the condition does not make the promise or order conditional for the
purposes of Subsection 70A-3-104 (1). If the person whose specimen signature
appears on an instrument fails to countersign the instrument, the failure to
countersign is a defense to the obligation of the issuer, but the failure does
not prevent a transferee of the instrument from becoming a holder of the
instrument.
(4)  If a promise or order at the time it is issued or first comes into
possession of a holder contains a statement, required by applicable statutory
or administrative law, to the effect that the rights of a holder or transferee
are subject to claims or defenses that the issuer could assert against the
original payee, the promise or order is not thereby made conditional for the
purposes of Subsection 70A-3-104 (1). However, if the promise or order is an
instrument, there cannot be a holder in due course of the instrument.
